test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_vuonjas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vuonjâš: # Checked with Matti Morottaja & Pekka Sammallahti; double čč should be the 1st form; č at least accepted, also recommended, if possible 
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuonjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Ill: [vuoˊnjâččân, vuoˊnjâčân]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Loc: [vuoˊnjâččist, vuoˊnjâčist]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Com: [vuoˊnjâččáin, vuoˊnjâčáin]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuonnjâšttáá
    vuonjâš+N+Ess: vuoˊnjâččin
    vuonjâš+N+Par: vuoˊnjâččid
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Nom: [vuoˊnjâččeh, vuoˊnjâčeh]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Gen: [vuoˊnjâččij, vuoˊnjâčij]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Acc: [vuoˊnjâččijd, vuoˊnjâčijd]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Ill: [vuoˊnjâččáid, vuoˊnjâčáid]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Loc: [vuoˊnjâččijn, vuoˊnjâčijn]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuoˊnjâččijguin, vuoˊnjâčijguin]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Abe: [vuoˊnjâččijttáá, vuoˊnjâčijttáá]

  Noun - kierâš: # MLO, ok 
    kierâš+N+Sg+Nom: kierâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Gen: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Acc: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Ill: [kieˊrâččân, kieˊrâčân]
    kierâš+N+Sg+Loc: [kieˊrâččist, kieˊrâčist]
    kierâš+N+Sg+Com: [kieˊrâččáin, kieˊrâčáin]
    kierâš+N+Sg+Abe: kierrâšttáá
    kierâš+N+Ess: kieˊrâččin
    kierâš+N+Par: kieˊrâččid
    kierâš+N+Pl+Nom: [kieˊrâččeh, kieˊrâčeh]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Gen: [kieˊrâččij, kieˊrâčij]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Acc: [kieˊrâččijd, kieˊrâčijd]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Ill: [kieˊrâččáid, kieˊrâčáid]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Loc: [kieˊrâččijn, kieˊrâčijn]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Com: [kieˊrâččijguin, kieˊrâčijguin]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Abe: [kieˊrâččijttáá, kieˊrâčijttáá]

  Noun - vuorâš: # MLO, ok 
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuorâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Ill: [vuoˊrâččân, vuoˊrâčân]
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Loc: [vuoˊrâččist, vuoˊrâčist]
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Com: [vuoˊrâččáin, vuoˊrâčáin]
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuorrâšttáá
    vuorâš+N+Ess: vuoˊrâččin
    vuorâš+N+Par: vuoˊrâččid
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Nom: [vuoˊrâččeh, vuoˊrâčeh]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Gen: [vuoˊrâččij, vuoˊrâčij]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Acc: [vuoˊrâččijd, vuoˊrâčijd]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Ill: [vuoˊrâččáid, vuoˊrâčáid]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Loc: [vuoˊrâččijn, vuoˊrâčijn]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuoˊrâččijguin, vuoˊrâčijguin]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Abe: [vuoˊrâččijttáá, vuoˊrâčijttáá]
